California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
(e) A service member on state active duty with the Military Department pursuant to this section shall be any of the following:

(1) A current member of the California National Guard. For purposes of this section, a member described in subdivision (c) of Section 210 shall not be qualified to serve on state active duty unless the member maintains current membership in the
 State Guard.

(2) An individual who is retired or otherwise honorably separated from service with the active component of any branch of the United States Armed Forces, the federal reserve component of any branch of the United States Armed Forces, or the federally recognized National Guard of any state or United States territory, with current membership in the State Guard.

(3) A current member of the State Guard with a
 minimum of two years of service.

(f) A service member already serving on state active duty who retires federally from the California National Guard shall assess into the State Guard
 in order to retain eligibility for continued state active duty.

(g) A commissioned officer on state active duty assigned to a general officer position who, previous to that duty, held a state active duty position at a lower grade, may revert to the grade last held upon vacation of the general officer position, if a position is available.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, a service member who is on state active duty may be relieved from state active duty if the Adjutant General, acting in good faith and on behalf of the Governor, abolishes a position. The department shall make reasonable attempts to place the service member in an available position for which the service member is otherwise qualified.

(i) The Adjutant General, under the authority of the Governor as Commander in Chief, shall promulgate
 regulations in conformity with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 16.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

143.

Whenever the Governor is satisfied that rebellion, insurrection, tumult, or riot exists in any part of the state, that the execution of civil or criminal process has been forcibly resisted by bodies of persons, that any conspiracy or combination exists to resist by force the execution of process, or that the officers of any county or city are unable or have failed for any reason to enforce the laws, the Governor may, by proclamation, declare any part of the State of California or the county or city or any portion thereof to be in a state of insurrection, and may thereupon order into the service of the state any number and description of the active militia, or unorganized militia, as deemed necessary, to serve for a term and
 under the command of any officer as the Governor directs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 9.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

144.

The Governor may at any time revoke a proclamation of insurrection or declare that it shall terminate at a time or in the manner that the Governor directs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 10.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

145.

A person who, after publication of the proclamation authorized by Section 143, joins, participates or takes any part in a rebellion, insurrection, tumult or riot, or who is party to any conspiracy or combination to resist by force the execution of the laws or who resists or aids in resisting the execution of process in any county or city declared to be in a state of insurrection, or who aids or attempts the rescue or escape of another from lawful custody or confinement, or who resists or aids in resisting any force ordered out by the Governor to quell or suppress an insurrection, is punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years, or in a
 county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 224.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

146.

The Governor may call into active service any portion of the active militia as may be necessary, and if the number available be insufficient, the Governor may call into active service any portion of the unorganized militia as may be necessary, in any of the following events:

(a) In case of war, insurrection, rebellion, invasion, tumult, riot, breach of the peace, public calamity or catastrophe, including, but not limited to, catastrophic fires, or other emergency, or imminent danger thereof, or resistance to the laws of this state or the United States.

(b) Upon call or requisition of the President of the
 United States.

(c) Upon call of any United States marshal in California, or upon call of any officer of the United States Army commanding an army, army area, or military administrative or tactical command, including generally the State of California, or upon call of any officer of the United States Air Force commanding an air force, air defense force, air defense command, or air command, including generally the State of California.

(d) Upon call of the chief executive officer of any city or city and county, or of any justice of the Supreme Court, or of any judge of the superior court, or of any sheriff, setting forth that there is an unlawful or riotous assembly with intent to commit a felony, or to offer violence to person or property, or to resist the laws of the State of
 California or the United States or that there has occurred a public calamity or catastrophe requiring aid to the civil authorities.

(e) Upon call of the sheriff setting forth that the civil power of the county is not sufficient to enable the sheriff to execute process delivered to them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 11.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

147.

In case of insurrection, invasion, war, rebellion, tumult, riot, breach of the peace, public calamity or catastrophe, or imminent danger thereof, or in the event of emergency in which all or any part of the militia is actively engaged in service upon order of the Governor, the Governor may suspend any and all provisions of this division or other laws of the State which require advertisement for bids for purchases of supplies or employment of services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

148.

The Governor shall direct the Adjutant General to make rules and regulations in conformity with this code which shall conform as nearly as practicable to those governing the United States Army, United States Air Force, and United States Navy. The rules and regulations shall have the same force and effect as the provisions of this code.

A finding by the Governor that it is impracticable to conform rules and regulations to those governing the United States Army, United States Air Force, or United States Navy shall be conclusive and the rules and regulations shall have force and effect over inconsistent rules, regulations, directives, manuals, or practices governing any of the Armed Forces
 of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 355, Sec. 4.   (SB 807)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The Adjutant General [160. - 190.]

160.

The Adjutant General is chief of staff to the Governor, subordinate only to the Governor and is the commander of all state military forces.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 114, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

160.5.

Any statute of this state referring to the Commanding General of the State Military Forces is deemed to refer to the Adjutant General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 517, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

161.

Within the Military Department, the office of the Adjutant General consists of one officer of the rank of lieutenant general who is the Adjutant General, one officer of the rank of major general who is the Deputy Adjutant General, one officer who may be of the rank of brigadier general who is the Assistant Adjutant General, Army, one officer who may be of the rank of brigadier general who is the Assistant Adjutant General, Air, one officer who may be of the rank of brigadier general who is the Chief of Staff and Director of the Joint Staff, and other officers as are prescribed by the laws or regulations of the United States. No person is eligible for appointment as the Deputy Adjutant General unless the person has not less than a total of five years of commissioned service in the National Guard of the United States, of which at least three years shall
 be service as a field grade officer in the California National Guard within the preceding 10-year period prior to the date of appointment and of which at least three years shall have been in command of army or air troops at the battalion or equivalent or higher command level or three years as a staff officer at brigade or equivalent or higher staff level. The Deputy Adjutant General is subordinate only to the Governor and the Adjutant General and shall have their duties assigned by the Adjutant General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 56.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

162.

The Governor, as Commander in Chief, shall appoint the Adjutant General, who shall be on state active duty, in the grade of lieutenant general, with the advice and consent of the Senate, and that person shall hold office at the pleasure of the Governor, or until their successor is appointed and has qualified. A person is not eligible for appointment as Adjutant General unless they have no less than a total of 10 years of commissioned service in the National Guard of the United States, of which at least four years shall be service as a field grade officer in the California National Guard within the preceding 10-year period prior to the date of appointment and of which at least four years shall have been in command of army or air troops at the battalion or
 equivalent or higher command level or four years as a staff officer at brigade or equivalent or higher staff level.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 13.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

163.

The Adjutant General shall perform such duties as are prescribed in this code and such additional duties consistent with the regulations and customs of the United States Army, United States Air Force, and the United States Navy as may be prescribed by the Governor. He shall issue all orders in the name of the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 466.)
-------------------------------------------

163.1.

All records of any special proceedings of any board of inquiry convened by the commanding general of the state military forces to investigate the causes of any accidents involving National Guard aircraft, the purpose of which investigation is prevention of future accidents, shall not be admissible for any purpose in evidence in any court of this state.

Whenever any such accident involves property damage or personal injury, a collateral investigation shall be conducted to ascertain the causes of such accidents and the records of any collateral investigations shall be discoverable under the appropriate sections of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1267.)
-------------------------------------------

164.

Subject to the approval of the Department of Finance, the Adjutant General shall appoint and fix the salaries of all clerical, expert, and technical assistants necessary for the proper conduct of his office. In general, the Office of the Adjutant General shall be organized according to general staff doctrine and procedure as set forth by the Department of the Army and the Department of the Air Force regulations where the same are not inconsistent with the laws of the State of California or this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 466.)
-------------------------------------------

164.1.

The Adjutant General shall receive the same pay and benefits pursuant to Section 320 as a lieutenant general in the Army of the United States and shall be paid in the same manner and at the same time as other service members on state active duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 355, Sec. 7.   (SB 807)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

166.

In the event of the absence of the Adjutant General or of their inability to perform their duties, the Deputy Adjutant General or other officer designated by the Adjutant General shall perform the duties of the Adjutant General.
 If those officers are absent or unable to perform their duties, the Governor may detail a National Guard officer to perform those duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 14.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

168.

The duties of the officers of the Office of the Adjutant General shall be such as are prescribed by law and regulations and shall conform as closely as practicable to the duties prescribed by orders and regulations of the Department of Defense for like officers in the United States Army, United States Air Force and United States Navy.

The Assistant Adjutant General shall be a brigadier general and shall receive the same pay and allowances as a brigadier general in the United States Army.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 466.)
-------------------------------------------

169.

The Adjutant General shall attest commissions issued to military officers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

170.

The seal now used in the Office of the Adjutant General is the seal of that office and shall be delivered by the Adjutant General to their successor. All orders issued from the Office of the Adjutant General shall be authenticated with this seal. Any order or directive inadvertently or mistakenly made or entered in the Office of the Adjutant General may for good cause and a reasonable time be vacated and set aside by the Adjutant General and a proper and correct order or directive made and entered in lieu thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 15.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

171.

The Adjutant General shall keep a register of all the officers of the militia of the State and shall keep in his office all records and papers required to be kept and filed therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

172.

The Adjutant General shall make a report to the Governor every fourth year, commencing in 1963, the report to include a statement of the moneys received and disbursed by the Adjutant General for military purposes, the number and condition of the active militia, and a history of the activities and developments of the Military Department during the preceding four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 114, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

173.

The Adjutant General shall, at the expense of the State, when necessary, cause the military law, general regulations of the State, Articles of War of the United States, a history or histories of the California National Guard or the units thereof, and such other military publications necessary for the military service to be printed, indexed, and bound in compact form and distributed to the commissioned officers, and the several organizations of the active militia, and to such other military personnel and organizations as the Adjutant General may find to be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 393.)
-------------------------------------------

174.

The Adjutant General shall cause to be prepared and issued all necessary blank books, blanks, and notices required to carry into full effect the provisions of this division. All such books and blanks are the property of the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

175.

In order that the active militia of the State may receive the funds provided by Congress, the Adjutant General shall prepare and submit a plan of proposed field or camp service of instruction for the ensuing year, with an estimate of the funds required for pay, subsistence, and transportation of the portion of the active militia participating therein and such other information as may be required by the Department of the Army or the Department of the Air Force or Department of the Navy of the United States. The estimate shall furnish the details and shall be made out in the form required by instructions from the Secretary of the Army or the Secretary of the Navy or the Secretary of the Air Force.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 466.)
-------------------------------------------

176.

The Adjutant General may exhibit, at such times and places as he may see fit, the equipment, animals, and property of the National Guard or Naval Militia and may give demonstrations thereof with the aid of personnel selected therefor. All expense in relation thereto shall be paid from State funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

177.

The Adjutant General shall attend to the care, preservation, transportation, safekeeping, and repair of all military property belonging to the State or issued to the State by the United States for the purpose of arming and equipping the militia.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

178.

All military property of the state which after a proper inspection is found unsuitable for the use of the state may, with the approval of the Department of General Services, be sold, destroyed, or otherwise disposed of by the Adjutant General. All proceeds shall be remitted to the State Treasury and credited to the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

179.

(a) The Adjutant General shall establish a California State Military Museum and Resource Center as a repository for military artifacts, memorabilia, equipment, documents, and other items relating to the military history of California, and to the history of the California National Guard, in accordance with applicable regulations of the United States Army governing Army museum activities. The museum may consist of the facility described in the Proclamation of the Governor dated May 11, 1994, and any branches as may currently exist or may from time to time be created throughout the state. Each facility shall be deemed to be an armory within the meaning of Section 430.

(b) The Adjutant General may enter into operating agreements with nonprofit historical foundations,
 military museums, historical societies, or other entities to conduct museum activities pursuant to the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder.

(c) Volunteers, docents, members of the California State Guard, or others working with or for the California State Military Museum and Resource Center, for purposes consistent with the mission of the organization, shall be considered volunteers under Sections 3118 and 3119 of the Government Code and Section 3363.5 of the Labor Code.

(d) No funds raised or assets acquired by an entity described in subdivision (b) shall be used for purposes inconsistent with support of the museum.

(e) The Military Department shall, no later than March 15 of each year, submit a business plan for the following fiscal year to the Director of Finance and the Chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for review and comment. The Military Department shall also submit, not less than 30 days prior to adoption, any proposed formal amendments to the business plan to the Director of Finance and the Chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for review and comment.

(f) (1) The Adjutant General or an entity described in subdivision (b) may solicit, receive, and administer donations of funds or property for the support and improvement of the museum. Any grants or donations received may be expended or used for museum purposes.

(2) Property of historical military significance, not including real
 property, that is owned by the state and is determined by the Adjutant General to be in excess of the needs of the Military Department, shall be transferred to the museum.

(3) Property determined by the Adjutant General or an entity described in subdivision (b) to be in excess of the needs of the museum may be sold, donated, exchanged, or otherwise disposed of, at its discretion, in a manner appropriate to the historical and intrinsic value of the property, and the benefits from the disposition shall inure to the museum. This paragraph does not apply to property held in trust for the Controller pursuant to Section 1563 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(g) The Adjutant General or an entity described in subdivision (b) may solicit and receive firearms and other weaponry confiscated by or otherwise in the possession of law enforcement officers as donations to the museum if
 the Adjutant General deems them to be of historical or military interest.

(h) The Adjutant General shall, in cooperation with an entity described in subdivision (b), conduct a study of the future needs of the National Guard to preserve, display, and interpret artifacts, documents, photographs, films, literature, and other items relating to the history of the military in California.

(i) (1) An entity described in subdivision (b) may enter into agreements with other military museums in California, including, but not limited to, the Legion of Valor Museum, to loan property that is not real property and that is under the direct control of the foundation.

(2) An entity described in subdivision (b) may enter into agreements with other military museums in
 California to loan property held in trust for the Controller pursuant to Section 1563 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 17.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

179.5.

(a) The Legislature acknowledges that certain artifacts of the Grand Army of the Republic that were at one time stored or displayed in the State Capitol were the personal property of certain members of the Civil War Roundtable. The Legislature acknowledges that those artifacts have been donated to, and are now in the custody of, the California State Military Museum and Resource Center, and are, thus, not the subject of this section.

(b) The Civil War memorabilia that are still located at the State Capitol and that are the subject of this section consist of the following:

(1) A display cabinet that once contained, among other things, artifacts of the Grand Army
 of the Republic that have since been donated by the Civil War Roundtable to the California State Military Museum and Resource Center mentioned in subdivision (a).

(2) Certain flags of the Grand Army of the Republic that have been, and continue to be, stored or displayed in the State Capitol.

(3) One or more paintings of the Civil War era that were donated to the state.

(4) Other remaining artifacts of the Grand Army of the Republic, and Civil War memorabilia.

(c) The articles specified in subdivision (b) shall be stored, cared for, or displayed as follows:

(1) The Adjutant General shall provide suitable accommodations within the California State Military Museum and Resource Center for the
 care and display of the display cabinet that was once used to display at the State Capitol the books, papers, and other artifacts relating to the Grand Army of the Republic and may make suitable arrangements for the use of this cabinet for the public display of these articles in locations throughout the state.

(2) Suitable facilities shall be provided at the State Capitol for storage or display within the State Capitol of the flags as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), of the Civil War era paintings donated to the state as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), and of other remaining artifacts and Civil War memorabilia as set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 818)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

180.

The Adjutant General is responsible for all military property which may be issued to the State by the United States. He shall prepare returns of such property of the United States at the time and in the manner required by the Secretary of the Department of the Army and the Secretary of the Department of the Navy and the Secretary of the Department of the Air Force.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 466.)
-------------------------------------------

181.

The Adjutant General shall superintend the preparation of all returns and reports required by the United States from the State on military matters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

182.

The Adjutant General shall keep a correct account of all expenses necessarily incurred, including pay of officers and enlisted persons, subsistence of militia, transportation of the militia, and all military property of the state. Those expenses shall be audited and paid in the same manner as other military accounts are audited and paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 2.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

183.

The Adjutant General shall issue such military property as the Governor directs, and under his direction shall make purchases for that purpose. No military property shall be issued to persons or organizations other than those belonging to the active militia except such portions of the unorganized militia as may be called out by the Governor, and except further the authorized and approved units of the California Cadet Corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 393.)
-------------------------------------------

186.

The Adjutant General may conduct a study to determine the feasibility of establishing a California National Guard memorial cemetery on state-owned property at Camp San Luis Obispo to serve as an interment site for members who have served at least 20 years in the National Guard and were discharged under honorable conditions or who were killed in the line of duty while serving on state or federal active duty, and for the spouses of these members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 644, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

187.

The Adjutant General may at any time purchase from the United States under the regulations of the Department of the Army and of the Department of the Air Force and of the Department of the Navy governing such purchases military property, equipment and supplies required by the military forces of this State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 466.)
-------------------------------------------

188.

In the event of a call to active duty in case of insurrection, invasion, tumult, riot, breach of the peace, public calamity or catastrophe, or other emergency, or imminent danger thereof, the Adjutant General, with the approval of the Governor, may secure all necessary supplies, equipment, meals, quarters, subsistence, transportation, medical, surgical, and hospital services, and dental and artificial devices for the officers and men and women called to active duty. Those purchases and services shall be exempt from the rules and regulations set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. Claims for expenses thus incurred, when approved by the Adjutant General as purchases for the emergency, shall be deemed valid claims against appropriations for military purposes.

Except as otherwise provided in this act all claims shall be subject to the laws relating to state procurement of materials, supplies, equipment, and services pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 114, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

189.

(a) The sum of three thousand dollars ($3,000) appropriated by Chapter 467, Statutes of 1913, for a cash revolving fund to facilitate the work of the Adjutant General’s office, shall be hereafter held, continued, and used by the Adjutant General for that purpose. All or any part of the money may be drawn from the state treasury without the submission of receipts, vouchers, or itemized statements and may be used by the Adjutant General in advancing cash payments for ordnance, equipment, material, labor, supplies, and incidental expenses requiring cash payments in advance, where the payments are necessary for the proper operation of the militia. Any amounts shall be repaid out of the appropriation against
 which they are a proper charge, upon itemized claims accompanied by proper vouchers and receipts, and the money returned to the cash revolving fund.

(b) The Adjutant General shall be liable on their bond for the money so advanced to the Adjutant General and may, to protect themself, require sufficient bond of the several employees under the Adjutant General in case it should be necessary to delegate any of them to disburse money from the revolving fund. The Adjutant General shall account for the money herein appropriated at any time upon demand of the Department of Finance or the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 16.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

190.

Federal funds shall be deemed to be available for federal-state joint construction of armories approved for such joint construction, when the federal appropriation of the funds has been approved and the National Guard Bureau or other appropriate federal agency advises the Adjutant General of the amount of funds apportioned or prorated to the State of California for such purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. The National Guard [210. - 270.]



  ARTICLE 1. Membership [210. - 217.]

210.

The National Guard consists of:

(a) General officers.

(b) The several staff corps and departments prescribed in tables of organization of the United States Army or United States Air Force or tables of organization for the National Guard.

(c) The officers and enlisted persons on the retired and the reserve lists.

(d) The organizations forming the National Guard and persons enlisted or commissioned therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 3.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

211.

The Governor may alter, divide, annex, consolidate, disband, or reorganize any organization, department, or corps and create new organizations, departments, or corps when required by the provisions of this division or whenever in his judgment the efficiency of the State forces will be thereby increased.

The Governor may also change the organization of any organization, department, or corps so as to conform to any system of drill, or instruction prescribed by the laws of the United States for the National Guard and for that purpose the number of the officers and noncommissioned officers of any grade may be increased or diminished and the grades of such officers and noncommissioned officers may be altered to the extent necessary to secure such conformity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

212.

The inactive National Guard shall consist of those organizations, officers, and enlisted persons as are authorized and prescribed by the laws of the United States and regulations issued thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 4.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

213.

Members of the California National Guard who have reverted from federal control to state control thereby become members of the State Guard and are subject to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 550) of Part 2 of this division for the unexpired period of their enlistment or appointment, unless upon reversion the members are assigned to active units of the California National Guard which have not been called or ordered into federal service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 18.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

214.

During the absence of organizations of the National Guard in the service of the United States, their State or Federal designations shall not be given to new organizations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

215.

For all purposes under this code, commissioned officers, warrant officers and enlisted persons of the California National Guard, California Air National Guard, and California National Guard Reserve who have heretofore or hereafter performed service in the United States Army, United States Air Force, United States Navy, or a reserve component thereof shall be entitled to credit for time so served as if that service had been rendered in the state forces. Service in the state forces shall include all full-time active duty and part-time duty performed heretofore or hereafter either as an enlisted person, warrant officer or commissioned officer pursuant to any prior or present section or sections or provisions of this code. Federal law notwithstanding, in computing state service for retirement with pay under this authority, full-time active service and part-time duty or service with the Armed Forces of the United States or any reserve component thereof shall be considered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 5.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

216.

Former members of the National Guard who have been honorably discharged for “expiration of term of service” or on account of “removal” and have returned to the limits of their commands, and officers who have resigned or have been honorably discharged, or whose terms have expired, who reenlist or reenter the National Guard within ninety days from the date of their discharge or the expiration of their term of office, shall be given credit for continuous service, and the enlistment considered consecutive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

217.

The California National Guard shall inform its members that it will assist noncitizen members in acquiring United States citizenship as soon as they are eligible. If a noncitizen member requests such assistance, then the California National Guard shall assist the member in filing all forms and paperwork necessary to become a United States citizen.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 497, Sec. 2.   (SB 156)   Effective October 5, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Officers [220. - 240.]

220.

All officers shall be commissioned by the Governor. All appointments of officers shall be made and all vacancies shall be filled in the manner provided by the laws and regulations of the United States Army and United States Air Force.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

221.

All officers duly commissioned shall take the oath of office prescribed by the laws of the United States relating to the appointment and recognition of federally recognized officers of the National Guard and in addition thereto any other oath prescribed by law, and file or be covered by the bond provided for in this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

222.

Persons to be commissioned in the National Guard shall be selected from those eligible for federal recognition in accordance with Army and Air National Guard Regulations promulgated from time to time by the Department of the Army or the Department of the Air Force of the United States and from former commissioned officers of the United States Army, United States Air Force, United States Navy, or any reserve component thereof, who were honorably separated therefrom but are no longer eligible for federal recognition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 118.)
-------------------------------------------

223.

All officers, warrant officers, and enlisted persons of the militia and all persons on duty with the militia shall give any bonds and security as may be required and within the time prescribed by the Adjutant General to secure the state against loss on account of misuse or misapplication of state or company property or funds or the property or funds of the United States in use by the State of California.

All bonds shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance of all duties and the accounting for all property and moneys, including organization funds, for which the obligee is responsible or accountable.

The Adjutant General may in lieu of the foregoing enter into an agreement conditioned in like terms and for the same purpose with a qualified surety company to bond all officers, warrant
 officers, and enlisted persons of the militia, and all persons on duty with the militia without specifically naming them. The agreement shall also provide that the report and final action of military or naval authorities having jurisdiction for fixing responsibility for loss or damage shall be conclusive proof of the responsibility or liability of any officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person in a suit brought to enforce the obligation of the bond.

The premiums on bonds shall be charged to those funds appropriated for the support of the militia as the Governor directs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 6.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

224.

Rank: How Determined. All officers of the National Guard shall take rank according to the date assigned them by their commissions, which date shall be that of their appointment, except that in the case of an officer who has previously held the same or a higher grade in the California National Guard, California Air National Guard, the Officers’ Reserve Corps, or has performed active duty in the same or a higher grade in the armed forces of the United States, his date of rank shall antedate his date of appointment by the length of time he has previously held such grade or performed such active duty. When two officers of the same grade are commissioned as of the same date, their rank shall be determined, first, by the length of previous services as an officer in the National Guard; second, by the length of previous military service in the National Guard; third, according to age, the eldest taking precedence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 466.)
-------------------------------------------

225.
